Arkansas, session 2025, HB1358.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 18-11-110(d), concerning the prohibition on
land ownership by a prohibited foreign-party-controlled business, is amended
to read as follows to clarify a criminal offense:
(d) A prohibited foreign-party-controlled business entity shall that
violates this section upon conviction be is guilty of a an unclassified
felony punishable by not more than two (2) years' imprisonment in the custody
of the Division of Correction or a fine of fifteen thousand dollars
($15,000), or both.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 18-11-802(8)(B) and (C), concerning the
definition of "significant interest" and "substantial control" as used with
respect to the foreign ownership of agricultural land, are reenacted to
ratify the decision by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission to change
references to "subdivision (5)(A)" to "subdivision (5)" in order to correct
reference errors.
(B) An interest of thirty-three percent (33%) or more held
*JLL002*
01/31/2025 10:13:59 AM JLL002

HB1358
whenever the parties, individuals, or governments referred to in subdivision
(5) of this section are acting in concert with respect to the interest even
though no single individual, party, or government holds an interest of
thirty-three percent (33%) or more; or
(C) An interest of fifty percent (50%) or more, in the
aggregate, held by parties, individuals, or governments referred to in
subdivision (5) of this section even though the individuals, parties, or
foreign governments may not be acting in concert.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. CONSTRUCTION AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly
or impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly;
(2) To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the
regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act:
(A) The act of the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly shall be treated as a subsequent act passed by the General
Assembly for the purposes of:
(i) Giving the act of the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly its full force and effect; and
(ii) Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of
the Arkansas Code of 1987; and
(B) Section 1-2-107 shall not apply; and
(3) This act shall make only technical, not substantive, changes
to the Arkansas Code of 1987.










01/31/2025 10:13:59 AM JLL002